North Dakota, session 69, HB1344.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 54-23.3 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Denial of admission.
1. If the department of corrections and rehabilitation is beyond capacity and denies the
admission of an inmate sentenced to the physical custody of the department, the department
may use local jails or correctional facilities and negotiate the terms of the agreement with each
facility.
2. Admission of an inmate is denied by the department when a county requests admission to the
department with a judgment of conviction ordering an individual to be placed with the physical
custody of the department and the request for admission is denied or unavailable within seven
days of notification to the department. When the denial of admission exceeds seven days, the
department is responsible to pay the contracted rate beginning from the date of initial
notification of the judgment of conviction and placement in the physical custody of the
department.
3. An agreement under this section must include a minimum daily rate per inmate, including
medical costs, to be paid by the department to the governing body of the jail or correctional
facility beginning the day after the department receives notice from the district court of an
order placing an individual in the care and custody of the department and ending on the
admission date provided by the department.

H. B. NO. 1344 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1344.
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 0 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State